Georgia, session 2025_26, HB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
in Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 5, relating to general authority, duties, and procedure, by
revising Code Section 50-5-84.1, relating to contracting with companies owned by Russia
or Belarus, as follows:
"50-5-84.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Company' means any sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation,
partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited
- 1 -

LC 44 3152-ECS
liability company, or other entity or business association, including all wholly owned
subsidiaries, majority owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of such entities
or business associations, that exists for the purpose of making profit 'Concerned goods'
means goods, including component parts, services, and technology, produced by a foreign
company of concern deemed by the Georgia Technology Authority to pose a security
threat to this state or its residents.
(2) 'Government of Belarus' means the Republic of Belarus 'Foreign company of
concern' means a sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership,
joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company,
or other entity or business association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority
owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of such entities or business
associations, that exists for the purpose of making profit and is:
(A) Organized or incorporated in a foreign country of concern;
(B) Owned or controlled by the government, a political subdivision, or a political party
of a foreign country of concern; or
(C) Has a principal place of business in a foreign country of concern.
(3) 'Government of Russia' means the Russian Federation 'Foreign country of concern'
means a country whose government is designated as a foreign adversary by the United
States Secretary of Commerce pursuant to 15 C.F.R. Section 791.4.
(4) 'Scrutinized company' means any company owned or operated by the government of
Russia or the government of Belarus.
(b) A scrutinized company shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on or submit a proposal
for a contract with a state agency for goods or services Pursuant to the authority provided
in subparagraph (a)(27)(B) of Code Section 50-25-4, the Georgia Technology Authority
shall maintain an up-to-date list of concerned goods produced by a foreign company of
concern or a foreign country of concern.
- 2 -

LC 44 3152-ECS
(c) A state agency shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal with respect to
a contract for goods or services to certify that the company is not a scrutinized company
The state or a state agency shall not purchase concerned goods from a foreign company of
concern, a foreign country of concern, or a third-party vendor or reseller.
(d) If the Department of Administrative Services determines that a company has submitted
a false certification under subsection (c) of this Code section If a company of concern,
directly or through a third-party vendor or reseller, sells concerned goods to the state or a
state agency:
(1) The foreign company of concern or third-party vendor or reseller shall be liable for
a civil penalty in an amount that is equal to the greater of $250,000.00 or twice triple the
amount of the contract for which a bid or proposal was submitted entire purchase value;
(2) The state agency or the Department of Administrative Services shall terminate the
contract with the foreign company of concern or third-party vendor or reseller; and
(3) The foreign company of concern or third-party vendor or reseller shall be ineligible
to, and shall not, bid on a state contract for an award of future state contracts for a period
determined by the Georgia Technology Authority."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended in said part by repealing Code Section 50-5-84.2, relating to
contracting with companies owned by China.
SECTION 3.
Said title is further amended in Chapter 25, relating to the Georgia Technology Authority,
by revising paragraph (27) of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-25-4, relating to general
powers, as follows:
"(27)(A) To establish and enforce standard specifications which shall apply to all
technology and technology resource related supplies, materials, and equipment
- 3 -

LC 44 3152-ECS
purchased or to be purchased for the use of the state government or any of its agencies,
which specifications shall be based on and consistent with industry accepted open
network architecture standards; and
(B) To evaluate security risks associated with the purchase of technology-related goods
and services made pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 5 of this title and to determine to
what extent the purchase of goods and services, in part or in whole, directly or
indirectly, poses a potential security threat to this state or its residents;"
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 4 -